Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.235.110

Suspension of laws, rules, inconsistent herewith.

Any provision of law, or any resolution, rule or regulation which is inconsistent with the provisions of RCW 28A.235.040 through 28A.235.110 is suspended to the extent such provision is inconsistent herewith.

[ 1990 c 33 s 246; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.30.080. Prior: 1967 ex.s. c 92 s 8. Formerly RCW 28A.30.080, 28.30.080.]